Wyoming statutes. Title 5 Courts
Chapter 1 In General
§ 5-1-107.
Personal jurisdiction; service of process outside state.

A Wyoming court may exercise jurisdiction on any basis not inconsistent with the Wyoming or United States constitution.

When the exercise of personal jurisdiction is authorized by this section, service may be made outside this state and proved according to the Wyoming Rules of Civil Procedure or any order of the court.

History.

Laws 1967, ch. 237, § 3; W.S. 1957, § 5-4.3; Laws 1977, ch. 178, § 1.

Cross references. —

As to service of process and proof of service, see Rule 4, W.R.C.P.

No personal jurisdiction due to insufficient contacts with Wyoming.—

Although an advisor claimed that it entered into a fee agreement with foreign corporations in the negotiation of a merger between the corporations and partially performed under that agreement in Wyoming, because the advisor failed to make a prima facie showing that the corporations purposefully availed themselves of privilege of acting in Wyoming, or that its cause of action arose from the consequences in Wyoming of the corporations’ Wyoming activities, specific personal jurisdiction did not exist over the corporations in a contract dispute. H&P Advisory, Ltd. v. Randgold Res., Ltd., 2020 WY 74, 465 P.3d 433,

2020 Wyo. LEXIS 84

(Wyo. 2020).

Promissory note.—

District court had personal jurisdiction over the purchasers for purposes of a seller’s action to collect on a promissory note where one purchaser had been served in the State, and the other had voluntarily appeared without contesting personal jurisdiction. Woodie v. Whitesell, 2019 WY 115, 451 P.3d 1152,

2019 Wyo. LEXIS 117

(Wyo. 2019).

No personal jurisdiction. —

Trial court did not have specific personal jurisdiction over the directors and officers (directors) of a Wyoming corporation since shareholders' (SH) injuries did not arise out of the directors' forum-related activities under the proximate cause approach as the directors were accused of taking action in China that damaged the value of the corporation that operated entirely in China; the but-for test was also not met as the directors' limited contacts with Wyoming were not a but-for cause of the shareholder derivative suit, and the incorporation of the corporation in Wyoming remained outside the causal chain leading to the SH's injuries. Schmitz v. Xiqing Diao, 2013 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 160685 (D. Wyo. Nov. 7, 2013).

Fraud case against several rating agencies was dismissed because whether the agencies knew that investors in Wyoming would rely on their credit ratings did not alone form the basis for exercising personal jurisdiction over them; the State failed to make a prima facie showing that Wyoming was the focal point or that the agencies expressly aimed their tortious conduct at Wyoming. Moreover, an allegation of a violation of the Wyoming Uniform Securities Act did not supersede the due process requirements of the United States Constitution. State v. Moody's Investors Serv., 2015 WY 66, 349 P.3d 979,

2015 Wyo. LEXIS 75

(Wyo. 2015).

Consent to personal jurisdiction. —

Complaint
against an individual defendant was improperly dismissed for lack
of proper service because the defendant, by not questioning the district
court's personal jurisdiction when the defendant filed a motion to
dismiss, waived the defendant's objection and submitted to the jurisdiction
of the court. Lundahl v. Gregg, 2014 WY 110, 334 P.3d 558,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2014).

Questions of fact as to validity of service. —

Complaint
against out-of-state individual defendants was improperly dismissed
for lack of proper service because questions of fact existed as to
the validity of the service in that, although the affidavits of service
had the stamp of a Utah notary, the notary's name was misspelled
on
the signature line. Lundahl v. Gregg, 2014 WY 110, 334 P.3d 558,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 126

(Wyo. 2014).

Jurisdiction extended to constitutional limit. —

This section extends state court jurisdiction in Wyoming to the constitutionally permissible limit. Shanks v. Westland Equipment & Parts Co., 668 F.2d 1165,

1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22482

(10th Cir. Wyo. 1982). See, also, First Wyo. Bank, N. A. v. Trans Mountain Sales & Leasing, 602 P.2d 1219,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1979).

No personal jurisdiction due to insufficient contacts with
Wyoming. —

Based on Wyo. Stat. Ann. § 5-1-107(a) and constitutional due process requirements, personal jurisdiction was lacking in a defamation case in which the parties' contractual dealings took place outside Wyoming, no defamatory statements were shown to have been made in Wyoming, and any contacts with Wyoming were attenuated. Cheyenne Publ., LLC v. Starostka, 2004 WY 88, 94 P.3d 463,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 116

(Wyo. 2004).

Jurisdiction is question of local law. —

Whether a foreign corporation is subject to in personam jurisdiction in a diversity action has been recognized in the tenth circuit as being an issue to be determined by application of state or local law rather than federal law. Prehoda v. Edward Hines Lumber Co., 399 F. Supp. 643, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16373 (D. Wyo. 1975).

Paltry allegations in complaint could not support personal
jurisdiction in Wyoming. —

Paltry allegations in the complaint could not support the exercise of personal jurisdiction in Wyoming. In particular: (i) at most, one of the defendants made isolated shipments to Wyoming at the request of third parties, (ii) unlike in Beverly Hills Fan Co. v. Royal Sovereign Corp., 21 F.3d 1558 (Fed. Cir. 1994), moreover, the cause of action for patent infringement here did not arise out of the isolated Wyoming shipments, (iii) plaintiff failed to submit any declarations identifying sales in Wyoming that would have refuted defendants' assertions that their contacts with Wyoming were sporadic at best, and (iv) plaintiff proffered no evidence indicating that Wyoming was part of any defendant's continuous, established distribution channels, AFTG-TG, LLC v. Nuvoton Tech. Corp., 689 F.3d 1358, 2012 U.S. App. LEXIS 18030 (Fed. Cir. 2012).

But basis of jurisdiction must not offend due process. —

Each case must depend upon its own facts, and the burden is upon the plaintiff to establish that a basis exists for the exercise of jurisdiction over the defendant by the federal district court so that such exercise would not offend traditional concepts of due process. Prehoda v. Edward Hines Lumber Co., 399 F. Supp. 643, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16373 (D. Wyo. 1975).

This section authorizes the state courts of Wyoming to exercise personal jurisdiction over an individual or a business organization only so long as the exercise of personal jurisdiction will not offend or violate the due process clause of U.S. Const., amend. 14. Markby v. St. Anthony Hosp. Sys., 647 P.2d 1068,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1982).

The courts of Wyoming are authorized by statute to exercise personal jurisdiction over defendants on any basis which is not inconsistent with the Wyoming or United States constitutions. So long as the exercise of jurisdiction does not offend the due process clause of the fourteenth amendment to the United States Constitution, the courts of this state have jurisdiction over a defendant. Amoco Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994).

Due process requires

that the defendant have certain “minimum contacts” with the forum state such that the exercise of jurisdiction over him does not offend “traditional notions of fair play and substantial justice.” Amoco Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994).

Prima facie showing of jurisdiction. —

Plaintiff failed to make a prima facie showing that personal jurisdiction existed over a nonresident defendant where plaintiff's pleadings did not include any reference to defendant's contacts with the state of Robinson v. U-Haul Int'l, 929 P.2d 1236,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1997).

In a breach of contract action, where the complaint and attached contract showed that nonresident defendant had contracted with the Wyoming plaintiff to drill a well on the defendant's Wyoming ranch, the plaintiff made a prima facie showing of personal jurisdiction over the defendant. Chamberlain v. Ruby Drilling Co., 986 P.2d 846,

1999 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1999).

Personal jurisdiction was proper under the Wyoming long-arm statute and the Due Process Clause in an insurer's declaratory action because the insured purposefully availed itself of doing business in Wyoming, its alleged negligence there was a causal event, and the exercise of personal jurisdiction was reasonable.
Emplrs Mut. Cas. Co. v. Bartile Roofs, Inc., 618 F.3d 1153, 2010 U.S. App. LEXIS 18690 (10th Cir. Wyo. 2010).

Distinction between “general” and “specific” personal jurisdiction.
—

The United States supreme court has distinguished between “general” and “specific” personal jurisdiction. “Specific” jurisdiction is when a state exercises jurisdiction over a defendant in a suit arising out of or related to that defendant's contacts with the forum. In contrast, “general” jurisdiction is when a state exercises jurisdiction over the defendant in a suit not arising out of or related to that defendant's contacts with the state. Amoco Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994).

Defendant's activities in state must satisfy minimal contacts
test. —

In order to bring a nonresident defendant within the long-arm jurisdiction of this state, the activities of the defendant within the state must be such as to satisfy the minimal contacts test. Leff v. Berger, 383 F. Supp. 441, 1974 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 6083 (D. Wyo. 1974).

Due process requires that a defendant have such minimal contacts with the forum state so that maintenance of the suit does not offend traditional beliefs of fair play and substantial justice. Prehoda v. Edward Hines Lumber Co., 399 F. Supp. 643, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16373 (D. Wyo. 1975).

Minimum contacts must exist between a nonresident defendant and Wyoming so that the maintenance of the suit here would not offend the due process clause of the fourteenth amendment. Shanks v. Westland Equipment & Parts Co., 668 F.2d 1165, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22482 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Transient jurisdiction constitutional. —

Transient jurisdiction does not offend the due process requirements of fair play and substantial justice. There is no unfairness or injustice in the exercise of personal jurisdiction based upon an individual's presence within a state. Nutri-West v. Gibson, 764 P.2d 693,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1988).

And minimum contacts analysis inappropriate. —

If an individual is served while present in the forum state, minimum contacts analysis is not appropriate for determining jurisdiction over that individual. Nutri-West v. Gibson, 764 P.2d 693,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1988).

Whether minimum contacts established decided on particular
facts. —

Whether a nonresident defendant has the requisite minimum contacts with the forum state to establish in personam jurisdiction must be decided on the particular facts of each case. Shanks v. Westland Equipment & Parts Co., 668 F.2d 1165, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22482 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

The determination of whether the exercise of jurisdiction is reasonable must be evaluated in light of several factors, including the burden on the defendant, the forum's interest in adjudicating the dispute, the plaintiff's interest in obtaining effective relief in a convenient forum if that interest cannot be adequately protected by his power to select the forum, the interstate judicial system's interest in the efficient resolution of conflicts, and in the shared interests of the states in furthering fundamental substantive social policies. Amoco Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994).

No personal jurisdiction. —

The quality and nature of the transaction alleged was, with respect to Wyoming, so random and fortuitous that defendant could not have anticipated being haled into a Wyoming court. O'Bryan v. McDonald, 952 P.2d 636,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1998).

But relationship between defendant and forum must be reasonable
one. —

Under the concept of minimum contacts, the relationship between the defendant and the forum must be such that it is reasonable to require the defendant to defend the particular suit which is brought here. Shanks v. Westland Equipment & Parts Co., 668 F.2d 1165, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22482 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

And nexus between forum state and cause of action dispositive.
—

In determining whether a state court may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident defendant, the nexus between the contact with the forum state and the cause of action is a dispositive factor. Markby v. St. Anthony Hosp. Sys., 647 P.2d 1068,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 353

(Wyo. 1982).

The burden is on the plaintiff, once the defendant has contested the court's jurisdiction over him, to make a prima facie showing that the defendant is subject to personal jurisdiction in the state. Amoco Prod. Co. v. EM Nominee Partnership Co., 886 P.2d 265,

1994 Wyo. LEXIS 152

(Wyo. 1994); Robinson v. U-Haul Int'l, 929 P.2d 1236,

1997 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1997).

This section allows for in-personam jurisdiction over an out-of-state guarantor of loan from Wyoming bank.

First Wyo. Bank v. Trans Mt. Sales & Leasing, Inc., 602 P.2d 1219,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1979).

Where products sold in contemplation of state use, purchase
from middleman irrelevant. —

Where alleged liability arises from the manufacture of products presumably sold in contemplation of use in Wyoming, it should not matter that the purchase was made from an independent middleman or that someone other than the manufacturer shipped the product into this state. Shanks v. Westland Equipment & Parts Co., 668 F.2d 1165, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22482 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Advertising, soliciting business establishes minimum contacts.
—

A Delaware corporation which manufactured aircraft in Kansas, and advertised and solicited business in Wyoming, established minimum contacts with Wyoming sufficient to support a federal district court's exercise of specific in personam jurisdiction over the corporation. Hayworth v. Beech Aircraft Corp., 690 F. Supp. 962, 1988 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 8514 (D. Wyo. 1988).

Parent corporation, insulating subsidiary's liability, subject
to jurisdiction. —

A nonresident defendant, a parent corporation of another defendant, a Wyoming engineering firm which was alleged to have negligently performed soil studies at in-state site for the plaintiff, was subject to long-arm jurisdiction in Wyoming, where, apart from its status as parent corporation of the engineering firm, it was transacting business in Wyoming on its own account, as well as attempting to insulate its subsidiary's assets and equity from exposure to liability which might have resulted from the suit. Eastridge Dev. Co. v. Halpert Associates, Inc., 853 F.2d 772, 1988 U.S. App. LEXIS 10133 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1988).

Minimum contacts were present

where a California newspaper sold syndicated features to newspaper subscribers; mailed solicitations to Wyoming newspapers and had solicited advertising in Wyoming, sent five to eight copies of its newspaper to subscribers in Wyoming, plus mailed 23 copies to Wyoming on Sundays; and dispatched three reporters to Wyoming for the purpose of investigating and writing the story for which it was being sued, which story concerned alleged criminal activities in Wyoming and had a Wyoming dateline. Anselmi v. Denver Post, Inc., 552 F.2d 316, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 14423 (10th Cir. Wyo.), cert. denied, 432 U.S. 911, 97 S. Ct. 2960, 53 L. Ed. 2d 1084, 1977 U.S. LEXIS 2537 (U.S. 1977).

Court had in personam jurisdiction to enforce order for child support

by using its contempt power, and jurisdiction was not lost by removal of the defendant from the state. Graham v. Fenno, 734 P.2d 983,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 418

(Wyo. 1987).

Court had personal jurisdiction over nonresident defendant in action arising out of contract

involving the transfer of a one-third interest in Texas property in exchange for a promissory note and the transfer of ownership of an airplane, where the only material change in the status of the parties since the execution of the contract was defendant's change of residence from Wyoming to Texas. Eddy v. Oukrop, 784 P.2d 610,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 255

(Wyo. 1989).

Insufficient nexus for personal jurisdiction. —

Where defendant to a quasi-in-rem action on a stock certificate issued by a Wyoming corporation is a resident of the state of Washington and was personally served in that state, this section has no application because she does not have a sufficient nexus with the state of Wyoming for the establishment of personal jurisdiction. Wyoming. National Crude, Inc. v. Ruhl, 600 P.2d 716,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1979).

Wyoming could not exercise personal jurisdiction over individual defendants since neither maintained continuous and systematic contacts with Wyoming or purposefully availed himself of the privilege of acting there. Dobbs v. Chevron U.S.A., 39 F.3d 1064, 1994 U.S. App. LEXIS 30115 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1994).

Minimal contacts not shown. —

Where the design, construction and distribution of an allegedly defective machine did not occur in Wyoming, but in Oregon; the injury fortuitously occurred in the state of Wyoming; the record did not reveal the extent of the manufacturer's sales in Wyoming; but, according to an affidavit, it appeared that the manufacturer had no agents in Wyoming and it was alleged therein that few sales had occurred in Wyoming; and further distribution into Wyoming was achieved by secondary means through another corporation, which it was alleged had no interest in or relationship to the manufacturer, given the record available, it would appear that this was a single occurrence and one injury and that the manufacturer did not have such “minimal contacts” as to render it amenable to the jurisdiction of the federal district court in conformity with the principles of due process. Prehoda v. Edward Hines Lumber Co., 399 F. Supp. 643, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 16373 (D. Wyo. 1975).

Local distribution of allegedly libelous material originally published in another state was an inadequate basis for obtaining jurisdiction. Whitaker v. Denver Post, Inc., 401 F. Supp. 60, 1975 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 15901 (D. Wyo. 1975), rev'd, 552 F.2d 316, 1977 U.S. App. LEXIS 14423 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1977).

Austrian manufacturer of ski binding equipment did not have sufficient contacts with Wyoming for the district court in the state to establish personal or general jurisdiction over it. Kuenzle v. HTM Sport-Und Freizeitgerate AG, 102 F.3d 453, 1996 U.S. App. LEXIS 32227 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1996).

Purposeful availment. —

Father's use of service of process within Wyoming to obtain mother's appearance in a custody action in Idaho did not constitute purposeful availment such that Wyoming courts obtained personal jurisdiction over the father. Goodwin v. Hall, 957 P.2d 1299,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 57

(Wyo.), cert. denied, 525 U.S. 873, 119 S. Ct. 173, 142 L. Ed. 2d 141, 1998 U.S. LEXIS 5660 (U.S. 1998).

Because a suit alleging negligence and other claims relating to a Pennsylvania bank's handling of a line of credit was based upon activities that had substantial connections with Wyoming, including the bank's acceptance of Wyoming property as collateral for loan funds that were used as working capital for Wyoming operations, the district court had personal jurisdiction over the bank. Black Diamond Energy Partners 2001-Black Diamond Energy Partners 2001-A Ltd. v. S&T Bank, 2012 WY 84, 278 P.3d 738,

2012 Wyo. LEXIS 90

(Wyo. 2012).

Shareholders did not satisfy the consequences of the action element of the purposeful direction inquiry for minimum contacts under this section and the Federal Due Process Clause since: (1) the directors did not expressly aim their alleged misconduct at Wyoming and the Wyoming corporation never operated there; (2) the corporation conducted business exclusively in China and its corporate headquarters were located in Beijing; (3) no shareholder resided in Wyoming; and (4) the corporation and its shareholders were injured primarily in China, or at least outside of Wyoming. Schmitz v. Xiqing Diao, 2013 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 160685 (D. Wyo. Nov. 7, 2013).

Trial court lacked personal jurisdiction over the directors and officers (directors) of a Wyoming corporation under this section and the Federal Due Process Clause since their actions as directors did not justify forcing them before a Wyoming court where: (1) the corporation was a phantom resident of Wyoming and did business only in China; (2) none of the directors resided in Wyoming; and (3) their contacts with Wyoming were minimal, and consisted entirely of phone calls and/or emails with corporate counsel located in Wyoming, but even that communication was sparse. Schmitz v. Xiqing Diao, 2013 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 160685 (D. Wyo. Nov. 7, 2013).

Shareholders satisfied the intentional action element of the purposeful direction inquiry for minimum contacts under this section and the Federal Due Process Clause as they claimed that the directors intentionally acted in a wrongful manner by falsely reporting inflated financial information to induce the public to invest in a corporation. Schmitz v. Xiqing Diao, 2013 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 160685 (D. Wyo. Nov. 7, 2013).

Shareholders did not satisfy the express aiming element of the purposeful direction inquiry for minimum contacts under this section and the Federal Due Process Clause since: (1) the focal point of any wrongful actions perpetuated against the corporation was in China as the corporation operated exclusively there; (2) the corporation had not conducted any business in Wyoming, and the true effect of the directors' alleged conduct was not felt there; and (3) no shareholder resided in Wyoming, so it could not be said that the directors intended to entice Wyomingites to purchase the corporation's stock at a nefariously-inflated price. Schmitz v. Xiqing Diao, 2013 U.S. Dist. LEXIS 160685 (D. Wyo. Nov. 7, 2013).

Loan participation agreements insufficient. —

Loan participation agreements involving South Dakota savings and loan associations, and ownership by the associations of Wyoming real property, were insufficient to establish personal jurisdiction over the associations in Wyoming, where the agreements created no rights between them and the borrowers, and the cause of action did not arise as a result of the associations' ownership of the Wyoming property. Ten Mile Industrial Park v. Western Plains Service Corp., 810 F.2d 1518, 1987 U.S. App. LEXIS 1520 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1987).

Out-of-state personal service on nonresident defendant. —

Under Rule 4(l)(1), W.R.C.P., and this section, out-of-state personal service upon a nonresident defendant is proper. First Wyo. Bank v. Trans Mt. Sales & Leasing, Inc., 602 P.2d 1219,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1979).

Out-of-state personal service can affect in-personam jurisdiction over nonresident.

First Wyo. Bank v. Trans Mt. Sales & Leasing, Inc., 602 P.2d 1219,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 484

(Wyo. 1979).

In personam jurisdiction is not required where proceeding is quasi-in-rem action,

affecting only the interest of the parties in specific property located in Wyoming. National Crude, Inc. v. Ruhl, 600 P.2d 716,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 456

(Wyo. 1979).

Personal jurisdiction is obtainable by federal court in manner permitted by state law

of the particular state in which the federal district court is held. Shanks v. Westland Equipment & Parts Co., 668 F.2d 1165, 1982 U.S. App. LEXIS 22482 (10th Cir. Wyo. 1982).

Tolling provision for departed defendant not rescinded. —

After the cause of action for medical malpractice accrued, the defendant departed from the state of Wyoming, and then, as §

1-3-116

plainly states, during his absence, the statute of limitations was tolled. The policy behind the tolling provision in the statute of limitations was not rescinded by the existence of this section, since only if the plaintiff had known where to find the defendant, which she did not, would this section have operated to permit effective service. Greenwood v. Wierdsma, 741 P.2d 1079,

1987 Wyo. LEXIS 518

(Wyo. 1987), limited, Adams v. Walton, 2011 WY 58, 248 P.3d 1167,

2011 Wyo. LEXIS 61

(Wyo. 2011).

Applied

in

Anderson v. Perry, 667 P.2d 1155,

1983 Wyo. LEXIS 352

(Wyo. 1983).

Quoted

in

Stanbury v. Larsen, 803 P.2d 349,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 151

(Wyo. 1990).

Stated

in

Olmstead v. Cattle, Inc., 541 P.2d 49,

1975 Wyo. LEXIS 170

(Wyo. 1975).

Cited

in

Booth v. Magee Carpet Co., 548 P.2d 1252,

1976 Wyo. LEXIS 183

(Wyo. 1976); Shaw v. Smith, 964 P.2d 428,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 145

(Wyo. 1998).

Law reviews. —

For case note on Cozzens v. Piper Aircraft Corp., 514 P.2d 1375,

1973 Wyo. LEXIS 185

(Wyo. 1973), see IX Land & Water L. Rev. 649 (1974).

For article, “Exemptions from Securities Registration for Small Issue: Shifting from Full Disclosure — Part II: The Intrastate Offering Exemption and Rule 147,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 161 (1976).

For comment, “Nonresident Jurisdiction in Wyoming: An Analysis of Jurisdiction in Products Liability and Libel Litigation,” see XI Land & Water L. Rev. 557 (1976).

For case note, “Civil Procedure — Ropin' em on the Range in the Cowboy State: Should Assertions of Transient Jurisdiction Be Subject to ‘Minimum Contacts’ Analysis? Nutri-West v. Gibson, 764 P.2d 693,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 164

(Wyo. 1988),” see XXV Land & Water L. Rev. 239 (1990).

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Long-arm statutes: obtaining jurisdiction over nonresident parent in filiation or support proceeding, 76 ALR3d 708.

Stipulation extending time to answer or otherwise proceed as waiver of objection to jurisdiction for lack of personal service — state cases, 77 ALR3d 841.

In personam jurisdiction, under long-arm statute, over nonresident attorney in legal malpractice action, 23 ALR4th 1044.

Religious activities as doing or transaction of business under “long-arm” statutes or rules of court, 26 ALR4th 1176.

Forum state's jurisdiction over nonresident defendant in action based on obscene or threatening telephone call from out of state, 37 ALR4th 852.

Products liability: personal jurisdiction over nonresident manufacturer of component incorporated in another product, 69 ALR4th 14.

In personam jurisdiction, in libel and slander action, over nonresident who mailed allegedly defamatory letter from outside state, 83 ALR4th 1006.

Execution, outside of forum, of guaranty of obligations under contract to be performed within forum state as conferring jurisdiction over nonresident guarantors under “long-arm” statute or rule of forum, 28 ALR5th 664.

Validity, construction, and application of “fiduciary shield” doctrine — modern cases, 79 ALR5th 587.

Service of process by mail in international civil action as permissible under Hague Convention, 112 ALR Fed 241.

Effect of use, or alleged use, of Internet on personal jurisdiction in, or venue of, federal court case, 155 ALR Fed 535.

§ 5-1-108.
Concurrent jurisdiction of the United States over certain lands in
Wyoming.

Concurrent jurisdiction over crimes and offenses under the laws of the state of Wyoming is hereby ceded to the United States over and within all the territory dedicated to national park, monument, historic site or public recreational purposes included in tracts of land in Wyoming designated as:

Grand Teton National Park;

John D. Rockefeller, Jr. Memorial Parkway;

Bighorn Canyon National Recreation Area;

Devils Tower National Monument;

Fort Laramie National Historic Site; and

Fossil Butte National Monument.

The concurrent jurisdiction ceded by subsection (a) of this section shall be vested upon acceptance by the United States by and through its appropriate officials, and shall continue so long as the lands within the designated areas are dedicated to national park, monument, historic site or public recreational purposes.

History.

Laws 1977, ch. 95, § 1; W.S. 1957, § 5-4.4; Laws 1980, ch. 15, § 1.

§ 5-1-109.
Deaf and
mute persons; rights enumerated.

In all civil or criminal cases in which a deaf or mute person is a party or in a grand jury proceeding where the person is a witness, the presiding judge shall upon petition appoint a qualified interpreter to assist the court and deaf person during the proceedings. The cost for the interpreter’s services may be assessed as court costs.

When a person who is deaf or mute is arrested for an alleged criminal violation, he may request the appointment of an interpreter. Unless the interpreter’s services are waived by the deaf or mute person, or unless the interrogation is conducted entirely in writing in the case of a deaf or mute person able to read and write, he shall not be required to submit to interrogation or make a statement unless the interpreter is present.

An interpreter appointed under this section shall serve the deaf or mute person and the court and shall in no instance offer legal counsel, advice or assistance to the deaf or mute person.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 68, § 1; 2004, ch. 42, § 1.

The 2004 amendment

deleted “or justice” following “presiding judge” in (a).

Laws 2004, ch. 42, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 3, 2004.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Deaf-mute as witness, 50 ALR4th 1188.

Ineffective assistance of counsel: use or nonuse of interpreter at prosecution of hearing-impaired defendant, 86 ALR4th 698.

§ 5-1-110.
Salaries of judges.

Subject to constitutional and statutory provisions concerning when salaries can become effective, judges of the supreme court, district courts, chancery courts and circuit courts shall receive the following annual salaries which shall be paid in equal monthly installments on the last working day of the month:

Supreme court justices shall receive an annual salary of one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012 and one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000.00) commencing July 1, 2019;

District court judges shall receive an annual salary of one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012 and one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000.00) commencing July 1, 2019;

Circuit court judges shall receive an annual salary of one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000.00) commencing July 1, 2017 and one hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($145,000.00) commencing July 1, 2019;

Chancery court judges shall receive an annual salary equal to the judges of the district courts.

In addition to the salaries provided in subsection (a) of this section, the legislature may provide through the budget process salary cost of living increases comparable to the increases provided to other state employees. Any such cost of living salary increases shall be specifically stated in a footnote to the budget bill by stating the total appropriation required as a result of any such increases along with the new salary amount to be provided to the supreme court, district court and circuit court. Any salary increase under this subsection shall be subject to constitutional and statutory provisions concerning when salaries can become effective.

History.

Laws 1988, ch. 96, § 1; 1990, ch. 45, § 1; 1991, ch. 244, § 1; 1998, ch. 105, § 1; 2000, ch. 24, § 4; 2002 Sp. Sess., ch. 97, § 1; 2004, ch. 89, § 1; 2007, ch. 81, § 1; 2008, ch. 46, § 1; 2012, ch. 89, § 1; 2017 ch. 175, § 1, effective July 1, 2017; 2019 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 1, 2019; 2019 ch. 200, § 2, effective March 15, 2019.

Cross references. —

As to salaries of judges of supreme and district courts, see art. 5, § 17, Wyo. Const.

The 2004 amendment,

effective July 1, 2004, increased judicial salaries.

The 2007 amendment,

effective July 1, 2007, in (a), rewrote the subsection to update the salary amount and commencement date for the salary of the supreme court justices in (i),
rewrote the subsection to update the salary amount and commencement date for the salary of the district court judges in (ii), and rewrote the subsection to update the salary amount and commencement date for the salary of the circuit judge judges in (iii).

The 2008 amendment,

effective July 1, 2008, the amendments to (a)(i) through (iii) increased amounts; and added (b).

The 2012 amendment,

effective July 1, 2012, in (a)(i), deleted “one hundred twenty-six thousand five hundred dollars ($126,500.00) commencing July 1, 2008 and” after “salary of,” and added “and one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012”; in (a)(ii), deleted “one hundred twenty thousand four hundred dollars ($120,400.00) commencing July 1, 2008 and” after “salary of,” and added “and one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012”; and in (a)(iii), deleted “ninety-eight thousand eight hundred dollars ($98,800.00) commencing July 1, 2008 and” after “salary of,” and added “and one hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($119,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012.”

The 2017 amendment,

effective July 1, 2017, rewrote (a)(iii) which formerly read: “Circuit court judges shall receive an annual salary of one hundred two thousand eight hundred dollars ($102,800.00) commencing July 1, 2009 and one hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($119,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012.”

The 2019 amendments. —

The first 2019 amendment, by ch. 200 § 2, effective March 15, 2019, in the introductory language in (a), added “chancery courts” following “district courts,” and added (a)(iv).

The second 2019 amendment, by ch. 98 § 1, effective July 1, 2019, in (a)(i) substituted “one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012 and one hundred seventy-five thousand dollars ($175,000.00) commencing July 1, 2019” for “one hundred thirty-one thousand five hundred dollars ($131,500.00) commencing July 1, 2009 and one hundred sixty-five thousand dollars ($165,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012,” in (a)(ii), substituted “one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012 and one hundred sixty thousand dollars ($160,000.00) commencing July 1, 2019” for “one hundred twenty-five thousand two hundred dollars ($125,200.00) commencing July 1, 2009 and one hundred fifty thousand dollars ($150,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012,” and in (a)(iii), substituted “one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000.00) commencing July 1, 2017 and one hundred forty-five thousand dollars ($145,000.00) commencing July 1, 2019” for “one hundred nineteen thousand dollars ($119,000.00) commencing July 1, 2012 and one hundred twenty-five thousand dollars ($125,000.00) commencing July 1, 2017.”

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2007, ch. 81, § 2, provides that “2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 35, Section 315 is repealed.”

Laws 2019, ch. 200, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 15, 2019.

Appropriations. —

Laws 2007, ch. 81, § 3, provides as follows: “There is appropriated from the general fund to the supreme court four hundred sixty-three thousand eight hundred eighty-one dollars ($463,881.00) for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2007 to implement the judicial salary increases authorized by this act.
This appropriation is intended to replace, on July 1, 2007, the unexpended appropriation previously authorized under 2006 Wyoming Session Laws, Chapter 35, Section 315.”

Laws 2008, ch. 46, § 2, provides as follows: “There is appropriated one million one hundred sixty-four thousand three hundred eighty dollars and twenty-six cents ($1,164,380.26) from the general fund to the supreme court. This appropriation shall be for the period beginning with the effective date of this act and ending June 30, 2010. This appropriation shall only be expended for the purpose of implementing the judicial salary increases authorized by this act. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this appropriation shall not be transferred or expended for any other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds remaining from this appropriation shall revert as provided by law on June 30, 2010.”

§ 5-1-111.
Full faith and credit for tribal acts and records.

The judicial records, orders and judgments of the courts of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Tribes of the Wind River Indian Reservation shall have the same full faith and credit in the courts of this state as do the judicial records, orders and judgments of any other governmental entity, unless at least one (1) of the following conditions is shown not to be met:

The tribal documents meet the authentication requirements of subsection (b) of this section;

The court is a court of record;

The court judgment is a valid judgment; and

The court certifies that it grants full faith and credit to the judicial records, orders and judgments of the courts of this state.

To qualify for admission as evidence in the courts of this state:

Copies of acts of a tribal legislative body shall be authenticated in accordance with the laws of the tribes and attested to by the appropriate tribal secretary;

Copies of records, orders and judgments of a tribal court shall be authenticated by the attestation of the clerk of the court. The seal, if any, of the court shall be affixed to the attestation.

In determining whether a tribal court is a court of record, the Wyoming court shall determine that:

The court keeps a permanent record of its proceedings;

Either a transcript or an electronic recording of the proceeding at issue in the court is available;

Final judgments of the tribal court are reviewable by a tribal appellate court; and

The court has authority to enforce its own orders through contempt proceedings.

In determining whether a tribal court judgment is a valid judgment, the Wyoming court on the motion of a party may examine the tribal court record to assure that:

The court had jurisdiction of the subject matter and over the person named in the judgment;

The judgment is final under the laws of the rendering court;

The judgment was procured without fraud, duress or coercion;

The judgment was procured in compliance with procedures required by the rendering court; and

The proceedings of the court comply with the Indian Civil Rights Act of 1968 under 25 U.S.C. §§ 1301 to 1341.

No lien or attachment based on a tribal court judgment may be filed, docketed or recorded in this state against the real or personal property of any person unless the judgment has been filed following the procedures set forth in W.S.

1-17-701

et seq.

This section shall not apply to the Tribal Water Code nor any official documents, public acts, records or proceedings of the Eastern Shoshone and Northern Arapaho Tribes related to water rights or the administration of water laws.

Nothing in this section shall be deemed or construed to expand or limit the jurisdiction either of the state of Wyoming or the Eastern Shoshone or Northern Arapaho Tribes.

History.

Laws 1994, ch. 97, § 1; 2022 ch. 82, § 1, effective July 1, 2022.

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2022, added “Indian” following “Wind River” in the introductory language of (a).